extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
Alah/c po:noun is:masculine
Alfred/c po:noun is:masculine
Andrej/c po:noun is:masculine
Arnold/c po:noun is:masculine
Aurel/c po:noun is:masculine
Bangladesan/c po:noun is:masculine
Bernard/c po:noun is:masculine
Bohdan/c po:noun is:masculine
Bonifac/c po:noun is:masculine
Budapestan/c po:noun is:masculine
Chorzowcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Cyril/c po:noun is:masculine
Demostenes/c po:noun is:masculine
Dominik/c po:noun is:masculine
Dusan/c po:noun is:masculine
Eneas/c po:noun is:masculine
Euripides/c po:noun is:masculine
Ferdinand/c po:noun is:masculine
Frankfurtan/c po:noun is:masculine
Gabriel/c po:noun is:masculine
Gdyncan/c po:noun is:masculine
Gnieznan/c po:noun is:masculine
Gross/c po:noun is:masculine
Haitan/c po:noun is:masculine
Havancan/c po:noun is:masculine
Hermes/c po:noun is:masculine
Hugo/c po:noun is:masculine
Izraelcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Janus/c po:noun is:masculine
Jezis/c po:noun is:masculine
Kain/c po:noun is:masculine
Kenan/c po:noun is:masculine
Korejcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Kretan/c po:noun is:masculine
Kuciak/c po:noun is:masculine
Laosan/c po:noun is:masculine
Liberijcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Lisaboncan/c po:noun is:masculine
Lotrincan/c po:noun is:masculine
Ludovit/c po:noun is:masculine
Majercan/c po:noun is:masculine
Managujcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Markoman/c po:noun is:masculine
Matovic/c po:noun is:masculine
Mekkcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Mikronezan/c po:noun is:masculine
Miskovcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Montecarlocan/c po:noun is:masculine
Nadlacan/c po:noun is:masculine
Nepalcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Norimbercan/c po:noun is:masculine
Oleg/c po:noun is:masculine
Ostratican/c po:noun is:masculine
Pankrac/c po:noun is:masculine
Pavol/c po:noun is:masculine
Petricek/c po:noun is:masculine
Porosenko/c po:noun is:masculine
Precincan/c po:noun is:masculine
Pytagoras/c po:noun is:masculine
Rakovnican/c po:noun is:masculine
Rene/c po:noun is:masculine
Riman/c po:noun is:masculine
Rudincan/c po:noun is:masculine
Satan/c po:noun is:masculine
Seychelcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Sokolcan/c po:noun is:masculine
Stetincan/c po:noun is:masculine
Tadeas/c po:noun is:masculine
Tchajwancan/c po:noun is:masculine
Timotej/c po:noun is:masculine
Toruncan/c po:noun is:masculine
Turcek/c po:noun is:masculine
Vaclav/c po:noun is:masculine
Vendelin/c po:noun is:masculine
Vincent/c po:noun is:masculine
Vratislav/c po:noun is:masculine
Zaircan/c po:noun is:masculine
Zilincan/c po:noun is:masculine
agronom/c po:noun is:masculine
antropolog/c po:noun is:masculine
bacik/c po:noun is:masculine
bek/c po:noun is:masculine
bojko/c po:noun is:masculine
bratovrah/c po:noun is:masculine
car/c po:noun is:masculine
chmulo/c po:noun is:masculine
coach/c po:noun is:masculine
dedic/c po:noun is:masculine
dekalog/c po:noun is:masculine
dobracisko/c po:noun is:masculine
dorabatel/c po:noun is:masculine
drzitel/c po:noun is:masculine
fararko/c po:noun is:masculine
gerontolog/c po:noun is:masculine
hostitel/c po:noun is:masculine
kamaratko/c po:noun is:masculine
kuli/c po:noun is:masculine
macik/c po:noun is:masculine
metalurg/c po:noun is:masculine
mravcek/c po:noun is:masculine
nahacik/c po:noun is:masculine
neclovek/c po:noun is:masculine
obhajovatel/c po:noun is:masculine
oftalmolog/c po:noun is:masculine
otorinolaryngolog/c po:noun is:masculine
pasacik/c po:noun is:masculine
placko/c po:noun is:masculine
poistovatel/c po:noun is:masculine
posol/c po:noun is:masculine
praotec/c po:noun is:masculine
priatel/c po:noun is:masculine
rarasok/c po:noun is:masculine
sach/c po:noun is:masculine
sef/c po:noun is:masculine
skolacik/c po:noun is:masculine
speleolog/c po:noun is:masculine
spolurucitel/c po:noun is:masculine
stazovatel/c po:noun is:masculine
sused/c po:noun is:masculine
syndik/c po:noun is:masculine
traumatolog/c po:noun is:masculine
udrziavatel/c po:noun is:masculine
velkododavatel/c po:noun is:masculine
vojacik/c po:noun is:masculine
vyrabatel/c po:noun is:masculine
zasobovatel/c po:noun is:masculine
zivitel/c po:noun is:masculine
zotrocovatel/c po:noun is:masculine
